Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1 General Provisions
65-15-109. Applications for permits.

The department shall adopt rules prescribing the manner and form in which motor carriers and/or contract haulers shall apply for intrastate or interstate permits required by this part. Every application shall be in writing and accompanied by the payment of fifty dollars ($50.00).

Applications filed for the registration of interstate authority by motor carriers engaged in interstate commerce shall be made in writing and be on such forms as required by the rules and regulations of the department. The application shall contain, among other things:

A copy of the interstate commerce commission certificate or permit for which application is made;

An equipment list registering and identifying vehicles used in the operation under such interstate commerce commission certificate or permit;

Evidence of currently effective insurance or qualifications as a self-insurer under the rules and regulations of the department; and

A filing of designation of a local agent for service of process;

provided, that the fee for additional authority shall not be refundable, except after a request by the carrier within six (6) months of the payment of such fee.

The department shall by rule promulgate the requirements for motor carriers, contract haulers, and exempt for-hire motor carriers operating on an interstate or intrastate basis, permanently or temporarily, to register their vehicles pursuant to 49 U.S.C. § 11506 [omitted] as amended by § 4005 of the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991. Under this single state registration plan, carriers registering with Tennessee shall file a written application annually on forms provided by the department. The application shall be accompanied by a fee of eight dollars ($8.00) for every motor vehicle to be operated by the above-mentioned carriers or contract haulers over the public highways of Tennessee in the calendar year for which the permit is issued. The application shall also be accompanied by the fees charged for every vehicle to be operated in those states participating in the single state registration plan for the same time period. The department shall remit those fees collected on behalf of the other states as provided under relevant interstate commerce commission rules. The application for single state registration shall contain among other things:

Evidence of the interstate commerce commission authority or permit under which the motor carrier operates in interstate commerce, where applicable;

Equipment list identifying vehicles to be operated in Tennessee and other participating states as permitted by interstate commerce commission rule;

Satisfactory proof of currently effective insurance as determined by the department;

Designation of a local agent for service of process; and

The accompanying fees and all information required on vehicles to be operated in other participating states.

All rules to implement single state registration of motor vehicles shall be in conformity with the rules of the interstate commerce commission, 49 C.F.R. Part 1023.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.9 (Williams, § 5501.8); Acts 1969, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1971, ch. 168, §§ 1-4; 1977, ch. 183, § 1; 1977, ch. 425, § 2; 1979, ch. 137, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1511; Acts 1985, ch. 94, § 1; 1986, ch. 862, § 3; 1993, ch. 327, §§ 3, 4; 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 1999, ch. 97, §§ 10-14.

Compiler's Notes. 49 U.S.C. § 11506 was omitted in the general revision of this Subtitle IV. Interstate Transportation, by Act Dec. 29, 1995, P.L. 104-88, Title I, § 102(a), 109 Stat. 804, effective Jan. 1, 1996. Section 11506 provided for registration of motor carriers by a state.

For current similar provisions, see now 49 USC § 14504a relating to the Unified Carrier Registration System plan and agreement.

Cross-References. Petitions to be in writing, filing fee, § 65-2-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58.

65-15-110. Liability insurance requirements. [For contingent operation, see the Compiler's Notes.]

No interstate or intrastate permit shall be issued by the department until such carrier shall have filed with the department, and the department shall have approved, a policy of liability insurance or bond and also, in the case of intrastate common carriers, a policy of cargo or passenger insurance in some reliable insurance company or association or other insurer satisfactory to the department and authorized to transact insurance business in this state, in such amount and such forms and upon such conditions as the department may deem necessary to adequately protect the interests of the public in the use of the public highway and with due regard to the number of persons and the amount of property to be transported, which liability or cargo insurance shall bind the obligors thereunder to make compensation for injury to persons, and loss of or damage to property resulting from the negligent operation by such motor carrier or contract hauler. No other or additional policies of insurance, bonds, or licenses than those prescribed herein shall be required of any motor carrier or contract hauler to which this chapter applies by any city, town or other subdivision of this state; provided, that this section shall not be so construed as to interfere with the right of any county, city or other civil subdivision of this state, to levy and collect any lawful tax to which such motor carrier or contract hauler is liable under the general revenue laws of this state within such county, state or other civil subdivision.

[For contingent operation, see the Compiler's notes.]

Any operator of a whitewater rafting outfitting company or other paddle and floating water activity operator who provides services to consumers on intrastate waterways and who transports customers distances not to exceed twenty-five (25) miles by motor carrier shall have filed with the department, and the department shall have approved, a policy of liability insurance in the amount of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000). Such policy of insurance shall meet the requirements of subsection (a) and shall bind the obligors thereunder to make compensation for injury to persons and for loss of or damage to property resulting from the negligent operation by such operator.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.10 (Williams, § 5501.9); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 9, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1512; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 1999, ch. 97, § 15; 2001, ch. 190, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 190, § 2, provided:

“This act shall become operative only if the federal highway administrator advises the commissioner of safety in writing that the provisions of this act shall not render Tennessee in violation of federal laws and regulations and subject to penalties prescribed therein.”

Acts 2001, ch. 190, § 1 added (b).

Acts 2001, ch. 190, § 3, provided: “The provisions of this act shall be null and void if such provisions are superseded by subsequent federal enactment.”

Law Reviews.

No-Fault Insurance, 39 Tenn. L. Rev. 132 (1971).

65-15-111. Safety rules and regulations — Inspection of vehicles, etc.

The department of safety, by the authority vested in it by this part to license, supervise and regulate certain motor vehicles operating on the highways of Tennessee, shall periodically promulgate such safety rules and regulations as the department of safety deems necessary to govern and control the safety operations and safe use of equipment by the following:

Each holder of an interstate or intrastate permit;

Any individual, corporation or partnership operating a motor vehicle in commerce which has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating of ten thousand and one (10,001) or more pounds, or the motor vehicle is designed to transport more than fifteen (15) passengers, including the driver; and

Any individual, corporation or partnership operating a motor vehicle of any gross vehicle weight transporting hazardous material. The safety rules and regulations described in this chapter do not apply to any motor vehicle transporting nonhazardous materials for farm purposes which does not travel outside the boundaries of this state.

The department of safety may inspect these motor vehicles for the purpose of safety.

This section applies only to the safety inspection of such vehicles, and does not require the department to issue certificates of convenience and necessity, contract hauler's permits or interstate permits to motor vehicles operating under this section.

Vehicles, trailers, semi-trailers and pole trailers subject to this section are placed under the jurisdiction of the department of safety's statutes, rules and regulations pertaining to safety, and every officer, agent or employee of any corporation or any other person who violates or fails to comply with this section or who procures, aids or abets in the violation of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in § 65-15-113.

The department of safety shall inspect and certify all homemade or materially reconstructed trailers, semi-trailers, and pole trailers which are required to be titled or registered in accordance with title 55, chapters 1-6, for compliance with all applicable safety rules and regulations promulgated by the department of safety.

The fee for such inspection to be collected by the department of safety is twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per trailer inspected. The department of safety may promulgate rules and regulations to implement this subsection (e).

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter to the contrary, 49 CFR parts 390-397, shall not apply to commercial motor vehicles operated in intrastate commerce to transport property that have a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.) or less; provided, that a Tennessee highway patrol officer with Level I training, having probable cause to believe such a commercial motor vehicle is being operated with unsafe loading or mechanical conditions, may stop such motor vehicle for inspection. If such motor vehicle is determined to be operated with unsafe loading or mechanical conditions, no citation may be issued, however, the officer shall implement out-of-service requirements as set forth in the commercial vehicle safety alliance out-of-service criteria. The exception provided by this subsection (f) shall not apply to vehicles transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded, or to vehicles designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver, as defined in title 49 of the CFR.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.12 (Williams, § 5501.11); Acts 1972, ch. 632, §§ 1-4; 1979, ch. 424, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1515; Acts 1985, ch. 111, § 1; 1988, ch. 817, §§ 5, 6; 1993, ch. 270, § 1; 1993, ch. 327, § 5; 1994, ch. 705, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 1999, ch. 97, §§ 18, 19; 2005, ch. 400, § 1; 2007, ch. 484, § 101; 2010, ch. 986, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-15-113.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 65-15-113 to § 65-15-111 by authority of the code commission in 2015.

Cross-References. Safety rules for homemade trailers, § 55-4-101.

65-15-112. Inspection, control, and supervision fee — Motor vehicle account.

Beginning January 1, 1994, for that calendar year and each calendar year thereafter, every freight motor vehicle required to register with the state pursuant to § 55-4-113, with the exception of those vehicles described in § 55-4-113(4), shall pay a safety inspection fee. This safety inspection fee shall provide a means for the state to exercise its police powers in order to protect the highways, and to promote the safety of the traveling public by the regulation of the use of and safe operation of such vehicles over the highways. This safety inspection fee shall be an amount equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the vehicle registration fees prescribed in § 55-4-113, for those freight motor vehicles subject to the fee. This fee to the department of safety shall be paid in addition to all property, franchise, license, or other taxes, fees and charges assessed or charged by law against the vehicle.

This safety inspection fee shall be paid annually as a part of the registration taxes due to the state for such freight motor vehicles. This fee shall be remitted to the department of revenue and shall be paid over to the department of safety for use in accordance with this section.

It is the duty of the department of safety to keep separate account of the safety inspection fees paid over to it by the department of revenue and to segregate them in an account to be known as the “motor vehicle account.” Any funds remaining in the motor vehicle account at the end of the year shall be carried over from year to year and expended only for the purposes specified in this part.

The department of revenue shall not issue or renew a certificate of registration or permit for any freight motor vehicle that fails to pay the annual safety inspection fee.

A lien is declared, and shall exist, upon all the property of each such certificate or permit holder, which shall be used upon the highways of this state, and upon which such fees shall be properly payable, for the payment of the fees prescribed by this part, together with all penalties accruing hereunder, which lien shall be superior to all other liens, except federal, state, county and municipal taxes.

All fines levied by the department of safety as well as all fees and penalties collected by the department of safety under this part shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the motor vehicle account, and used to defray the expenses incurred by the department in the enforcement of this part.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 14; 1941, ch. 70, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.15 (Williams, § 5501.14); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1955, ch. 148, § 1; 1961, ch. 326, § 2; 1971, ch. 168, § 5; 1972, ch. 471, § 1; 1979, ch. 137, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1518; Acts 1989, ch. 371, § 1; 1993, ch. 327, §§ 6-9; 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 2007, ch. 484, § 102; T.C.A. § 65-15-116.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 65-15-116 to § 65-15-112 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Cross-References. Supervision fee and inspection provisions inapplicable, § 65-15-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58.

65-15-113. Penalties for violations.

Notwithstanding Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113, every officer, agent or employee of any corporation, or any other person who knowingly violates or fails to comply with or who procures, aids or abets in the violation of this part, commits a Class B misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof for the first offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00), for the second offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00), and for the third offense be punished by a fine not less than one hundred dollars ($100). Each day any such provision is violated is a separate offense.

Every officer, agent or employee of any corporation and every other person who knowingly fails to obey, observe or comply with any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand or requirement of the department made in pursuance of the power and authority conferred by this part, commits a Class B misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months, or both, in the discretion of the court. Each day any such order, decision, rule or regulation, etc., of the department of safety is violated, is a separate offense. The fact that there may have been a prosecution for the violation of any such order, decision, rule or regulation, etc., of the department of safety under this section does not operate to prevent or limit the commissioner of safety from requesting that the commissioner of revenue suspend or revoke the interstate permit or intrastate permit, or both, as provided in this part and, upon receipt of such a request from the commissioner of safety, the commissioner of revenue shall immediately make the suspension or revocation requested.

Acts 1933, ch. 119, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 5501.19 (Williams, § 5501.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1524; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 881, § 2; 1993, ch. 382, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 1999, ch. 97, §§ 23, 24; 2007, ch. 484, § 103; T.C.A. § 65-15-122.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 65-15-122 to § 65-15-113 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Note. Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113, referenced in subsection (a), had directed the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission to amend this section to indicate violation of the section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

65-15-114. Transporting nuclear fuel.

“Spent nuclear fuel” means as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 10101(12) and (23) and the following:

The highly radioactive material resulting from the reprocessing of spent nuclear fuel, including liquid waste produced directly in reprocessing and any solid material derived from such liquid waste that contains fission products in sufficient concentrations;

Other highly radioactive material that is designated by the nuclear regulatory commission by rule for permanent isolation; and

Fuel that has been withdrawn from a nuclear reactor following irradiation, the constituent elements of which have not been separated by reprocessing.

No person, firm, or corporation shall cause to be shipped or shall arrange for transportation upon the highways or railways of this state any spent nuclear fuel unless such person, firm or corporation notifies the emergency management agency which shall notify the department of safety (hereinafter referred to as the “department”) in advance of any transportation of spent nuclear fuel through or within the state. In the case of spent nuclear fuel for which by law the United States nuclear regulatory commission notifies the governor, the governor or the governor's designee shall within twenty-four (24) hours after receipt of such notification, notify the department of the transportation of such materials. The notification of such shipments and all facts and circumstances relevant thereto shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed to the public in the interest of national security.

A fee shall be assessed for all nuclear spent fuel shipments at the rate of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per cask for truck shipments, and two thousand dollars ($2,000) per cask for rail shipments received at or departing from any nuclear power station or away from a reactor spent fuel storage facility located in Tennessee. The owner of such facility shall pay this fee. The same fees prescribed by this subsection (c) shall apply to all spent nuclear fuel shipments traversing this state and the shipper of such shipments shall pay these fees.

Any person, firm, or corporation shipping or arranging transportation of nuclear spent fuel within or through this state shall in advance of such shipments maintain a bond or surety with a bonding or insurance company, satisfactory to the department of safety and authorized to do business in this state, in such form and for such amount as the department of safety may prescribe, to guarantee payment of the fees prescribed by this section. Failure to pay any fees due and owing under this section within the sixty (60) days following shipments of nuclear spent fuel shall authorize the department of safety to proceed against the shipper's bond.

The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the general fund in a special account entitled the nuclear safety fund. The moneys in this fund shall only be used to fund activities related to the state's nuclear safety enforcement program and shall only be allocated to the department of safety, the department of environment and conservation, and the Tennessee emergency management agency to cover reasonable expenses incurred by each respective agency in implementing and enforcing this section.

Any person, firm, or corporation shipping or arranging transportation for the shipment of nuclear spent fuel and subject to this section shall provide an appropriate escort for all such shipments within or through this state. The acceptable training, manpower, and equipment requirements for the provision of this escort service shall be established by department rule.

This section applies to all shipments of nuclear spent fuel originating in, destined to or traversing this state.

The department of safety is authorized to adopt, promulgate, amend and repeal rules and regulations necessary to implement this section.

No rule or regulation, safety or otherwise, adopted, promulgated, amended or repealed by the department of safety under the authority of this section concerning transportation of nuclear materials shall impose a requirement which is more restrictive or inconsistent with that of any existing rule or regulation promulgated or adopted by the United States nuclear regulatory commission or the United States department of transportation.

Acts 1979, ch. 424, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-1528; Acts 1989, ch. 319, §§ 1-6; 1991, ch. 391, § 3; 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 2007, ch. 484, § 104; T.C.A. § 65-15-126.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 65-15-126 to § 65-15-114 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Monitoring of radioactive truck traffic, § 68-202-104.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 89-97, 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 83 (7/17/89).

65-15-115. Powers and duties — Citizen transportation area.

Upon petition by a county mayor or the legislative body of any county, the department of safety is authorized to designate that county a “citizen transportation area” authorizing the use of church buses, privately owned school buses, and private citizens to carry passengers for compensation within the boundaries of the county.

The department of safety in designating the county a “citizen transportation area” shall consider the availability of regular fixed route bus service to the area, the charter service actually provided to the citizens of the area by the existing franchised carriers, the potential service available to the community if regulatory requirements were relaxed, and whether the transportation needs of the citizens of that area are best met by the existing regulatory statutes.

The designation shall continue until revoked by the department of safety upon due notice and an opportunity to be heard.

However, the department of safety may inspect vehicles for purpose of safety and vehicles shall be subject to § 65-15-111.

Acts 1977, ch. 279, § 1; 1978, ch. 934, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 5-619, 5-6-119; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 30; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2007, ch. 484, § 105; T.C.A. § 65-15-127.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 65-15-127 to § 65-15-115 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

65-15-116. Passenger transportation services.

Notwithstanding this title or title 7, chapter 51, to the contrary, each for-hire motor carrier providing passenger transportation service in a motor vehicle or motor vehicles designed or constructed to accommodate and transport passengers, eight (8) or more in number, services exclusive of the driver, or any motor vehicle transporting passengers who are TennCare enrollees eligible for such transportation services under TennCare, excluding those vehicles licensed and permitted pursuant to title 68, chapter 140, part 3, shall at a minimum:

Maintain a policy of liability insurance in the amount of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in value, which shall bind the obligors under the policy to make compensation for injury to persons and for loss of or damage to property resulting from the negligent operation by the driver, unless the transportation provider is a self insured local government or public transportation provider;

Conduct a program of mandatory random drug testing for the operators of its motor vehicles in accordance with regulations promulgated by the United States department of transportation;

Require the operators of its motor vehicles to submit to physical examination every two (2) years, in accordance with regulations promulgated by the United States department of transportation;

Subject each transportation provider operating in the capacity as a passenger transportation service to an annual safety examination compliance review to be conducted by the department of safety. For purposes of this section, “compliance review” means reviewing:

Proof of insurance or self insured status;

Employee random drug testing documents;

Employee physical examination documents; and

Vehicle maintenance records; and

Comply with all other requirements deemed necessary to protect the public safety and welfare as specified by the department of safety in its promulgation of rules and regulations to effectuate such purpose.

The commissioner of safety is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2007, ch. 329, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 321, § 29; 2010, ch. 1013, § 1; 2012, ch. 539, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-15-128.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 65-15-128 to § 65-15-116 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-15-117. Motor carrier safety improvement.

The deployment, implementation, or use of a motor carrier safety improvement by or as required by a motor carrier or its related entity, including by contract, shall not be considered when evaluating an individual's status as an employee or independent contractor, or as a jointly employed employee, under any state law.

For purposes of this section, “motor carrier safety improvement” means any device, equipment, software, technology, procedure, training, policy, program, or operational practice intended and primarily used to improve or facilitate any of the following:

Compliance with traffic safety or motor carrier safety laws;

Safety of a motor vehicle;

Safety of the operator of a motor vehicle; or

Safety of third-party users of public roadways.

Acts 2019, ch. 97, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 97, § 2 provided that nothing in the act shall affect the liability of common carriers, motor carriers, private motor carriers, or trucking companies, as provided in the federal Motor Carrier Safety Act of 1986 (49 U.S.C. §§ 13901 et seq.); federal motor carrier safety regulations of the federal motor carrier safety administration, compiled in 49 C.F.R. §§ 350 - 399; Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 15, Part 1; and rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Sections 65-15-106 and 65-15-113, pertaining to the supervision and control of motor carrier vehicles and motor buses, including, but not limited to, Tenn. Comp. R. & Reg. 1340-06-01-.08.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 97, § 3. March 28, 2019.